Illinois, session 104th, SB1423.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5adding Section 45-59 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/45-59 new)7    Sec. 45-59. Veteran-owned small business set-asides.8    (a) It is the public policy of this State to promote and 9encourage the continued economic development of small 10businesses owned by qualified veterans and for these 11veteran-owned small businesses to participate in the State's 12procurement process as prime contractors. Set-aside contracts 13will promote the certification of qualified veteran-owned 14small businesses by the Commission on Equity and Inclusion and 15promote contract awards to those businesses by State agencies. 16    (b) As used in this Section:17    "Veteran-owned small business" means either a qualified 18service-disabled veteran-owned small business or a qualified 19veteran-owned small business, as defined in subsection (e) of 20Section 45-57 of this Code. 21    (c) Each chief chief procurement officer has the authority 22to designate as a veteran-owned small business set-aside a 23fair proportion of construction, supply, and service contracts   SB1423- 2 -LRB104 11928 JDS 22021 b1for award to veteran-owned small businesses in Illinois. 2Advertisements for bids or offers for these contracts shall 3specify designation as a veteran-owned small business 4set-aside. In awarding the contracts, only bids or offers from 5qualified veteran-owned small businesses shall be considered. 6    A veteran small business set-aside designation may be 7withdrawn by the purchasing agency when deemed in the best 8interests of the State. Upon withdrawal, all bids or offers 9with respect to the contract shall be rejected, and the 10bidders or offerors shall be notified of the reason for 11rejection. The contract shall then be awarded in accordance 12with this Code without the designation of veteran small 13business set-aside. 14    Each chief procurement officer may adopt rules to 15implement and administer the use of veteran-owned small 16business set-asides. 17    (d) By November 1 of each year, each chief procurement 18officer shall report to the General Assembly on all the 19following for the immediately preceding fiscal year: 20        (1) the total number of veteran-owned small businesses 21    that submitted bids or offers for set-aside contracts 22    under this Section; 23        (2) the total number of set-aside contracts awarded to 24    veteran-owned small businesses under this Section; and 25        (3) the total value of set-aside contracts awarded to 26    veteran-owned small businesses under this Section.   SB1423- 3 -LRB104 11928 JDS 22021 b1    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 2under this subsection (d) shall be satisfied by filing copies 3of the report as required by Section 3.1 of the General 4Assembly Organization Act.